Missouri, session 2026, SB1765.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:

There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, and program described herein for the item or items stated, and
for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period beginning
July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:


Section 19.005. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance,
repairs, replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
From Department of Natural Resources Federal and Other Fund (1140). ........$2,000,000
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ...................................1,750,000
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613)................................... 3,000,000

SB 1765 2
Total..............................................................$6,750,000


Section 19.010. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition
and development; financial assistance to other public agencies
or in partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement
on department land
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609). ...........................$40,200,000

Section 19.015. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance,
repair, and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol
maintenance garage
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).............$4,557,900

For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance,
repair, and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol
Troop I Headquarters
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).............12,202,541

For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance,
repair, and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol
Interoperability storage building
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).......... 884,591
Total.............................................................$17,645,032


Section 19.020. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)........................$35,000,000


SB 1765 3

Section 19.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
improvements at Camp Avery
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund (1202). ..... $680,040
(cid:252)